Utah statutes.
59-2-325.   Statement transmitted to commission and state auditor.

The county auditor shall, before November 1 of each year, prepare from the assessment rolls of that year a statement showing the amount and value of all property in the county, as classified by the county assessment rolls, and the value of each class; the total amount of taxes remitted by the county board of equalization; the state's share of the taxes remitted; the county's share of the taxes remitted; the rate of county taxes; and any other information requested by the state auditor.  The statement shall be made in duplicate, upon forms provided by the state auditor, and as soon as prepared shall be transmitted, one copy to the state auditor and one copy to the commission.

